Massachusetts, session 194th, H4909.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding paragraph (o) of subdivision (1) and paragraphs (b) and (c) 
of subdivisions (2) of section 4 of chapter 32 of the General Laws or any other general or special 
law to the contrary, and in order to promote the public good, the Salem Retirement Board shall 
provide creditable service for reserve, permanent-intermittent, or call service of certain public 
safety personnel employed either by the City of Salem's Police Department or Fire Department , 
who became members of the Salem Retirement System on or before February 11, 2020, without 
payment for such creditable service. 
SECTION 2. This bill shall take effect upon its passage